src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Compound nouns.

Tests:
  Noun - alkoholaváddu: # GOAHTI-A SgNomCmp + GOAHTI-U 
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom:  alkoholaváddu
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: [alkoholaváttu, alkoholavátto]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc:  alkoholaváttu
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc:  alkoholaváttus
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Ill:  alkoholaváddui
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com:  alkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom:  alkoholaváttut
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen:  alkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc:  alkoholaváttuid
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc:  alkoholaváttuin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill:  alkoholaváttuide
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com:  alkoholaváttuiguin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess:     alkoholaváddun
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: alkoholaváttoš
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: alkoholaváttožaš
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [alkoholaváttuheapme, alkoholaváttoheapme]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: alkoholaváttolaš
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Nom:  alkohola-váddu
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Gen: [alkohola-váttu, alkohola-vátto]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Acc:  alkohola-váttu
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Loc:  alkohola-váttus
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Ill:  alkohola-váddui
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Sg+Com:  alkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Nom:  alkohola-váttut
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Gen:  alkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Acc:  alkohola-váttuid
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Loc:  alkohola-váttuin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Ill:  alkohola-váttuide
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Pl+Com:  alkohola-váttuiguin
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Ess:     alkohola-váddun
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: alkohola-váttoš
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: alkohola-váttožaš
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [alkohola-váttuheapme, alkohola-váttoheapme]
    alkohola+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#váddu+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [alkohola-váttolaš]

  Noun - juogusgirji: # MALISLONG SgNomCmp + GOAHTI-I
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Nom:  juogusgirji
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Gen: [juogusgirjji, juogusgirjje]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Acc:  juogusgirjji
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Loc:  juogusgirjjis
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Ill:  juogusgirjái
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Com:  juogusgirjjiin
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Nom:  juogusgirjjit
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Gen:  juogusgirjjiid
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Acc:  juogusgirjjiid
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Loc:  juogusgirjjiin
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Ill:  juogusgirjjiide
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Com:  juogusgirjjiiguin
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Ess:     juogusgirjin
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogusgirjjáš
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogusgirjjážaš
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [juogusgirjjiheapme, juogusgirjjeheapme]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#girji+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: juogusgirjjálaš
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Nom:  juogus-girji
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Gen: [juogus-girjji, juogus-girjje]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Acc:  juogus-girjji
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Loc:  juogus-girjjis
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Ill:  juogus-girjái
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Sg+Com:  juogus-girjjiin
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Nom:  juogus-girjjit
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Gen:  juogus-girjjiid
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Acc:  juogus-girjjiid
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Loc:  juogus-girjjiin
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Ill:  juogus-girjjiide
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Pl+Com:  juogus-girjjiiguin
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Ess:     juogus-girjin
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogus-girjjáš
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: juogus-girjjážaš
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [juogus-girjjiheapme, juogus-girjjeheapme]
    juogus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#girji+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: juogus-girjjálaš

  Noun - beroštusgeašluondu: # JOHTOLAT SgNom + MiddleNouns + LUONDU
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Nom:          [beroštusgeašluondu,        berostusgeašluondu       ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Gen:          [beroštusgeašluonddu,       berostusgeašluonddu      ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Acc:          [beroštusgeašluonddu,       berostusgeašluonddu      ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Loc:          [beroštusgeašluonddus,      berostusgeašluonddus     ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Ill:          [beroštusgeašlundui,        berostusgeašlundui       ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Com:          [beroštusgeašluondduin,     berostusgeašluondduin    ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Nom:          [beroštusgeašluonddut,      berostusgeašluonddut     ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Gen:          [beroštusgeašluondduid,     berostusgeašluondduid    ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Acc:          [beroštusgeašluondduid,     berostusgeašluondduid    ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Loc:          [beroštusgeašluondduin,     berostusgeašluondduin    ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Ill:          [beroštusgeašluondduide,    berostusgeašluondduide   ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Com:          [beroštusgeašluondduiguin,  berostusgeašluondduiguin ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#luondu+N+Ess:             [beroštusgeašluondun,       berostusgeašluondun      ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Nom: [beroštusgeaš-luondu,       berostusgeaš-luondu      ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Gen: [beroštusgeaš-luonddu,      berostusgeaš-luonddu     ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Acc: [beroštusgeaš-luonddu,      berostusgeaš-luonddu     ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Loc: [beroštusgeaš-luonddus,     berostusgeaš-luonddus    ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Ill: [beroštusgeaš-lundui,       berostusgeaš-lundui      ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Sg+Com: [beroštusgeaš-luondduin,    berostusgeaš-luondduin   ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Nom: [beroštusgeaš-luonddut,     berostusgeaš-luonddut    ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Gen: [beroštusgeaš-luondduid,    berostusgeaš-luondduid   ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Acc: [beroštusgeaš-luondduid,    berostusgeaš-luondduid   ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Loc: [beroštusgeaš-luondduin,    berostusgeaš-luondduin   ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Ill: [beroštusgeaš-luondduide,   berostusgeaš-luondduide  ]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Pl+Com: [beroštusgeaš-luondduiguin, berostusgeaš-luondduiguin]
    beroštus+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#geahči+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#luondu+N+Ess:    [beroštusgeaš-luondun,      berostusgeaš-luondun     ]

  Noun - dábálašbeaivebálká: # DABALAS SgNomCmp + ALBMILONG 
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálká
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: dábálašbeaivebálkká
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: dábálašbeaivebálkká
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: dábálašbeaivebálkkás
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: dábálašbeaivebálkái
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Com: dábálašbeaivebálkkáin
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkát
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Gen: dábálašbeaivebálkkáid
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Acc: dábálašbeaivebálkkáid
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Loc: dábálašbeaivebálkkáin
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Ill: dábálašbeaivebálkkáide
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Com: dábálašbeaivebálkkáiguin
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Ess: dábálašbeaivebálkán
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkáš
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkážaš
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkáheapme
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: dábálašbeaivebálkkálaš
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Nom: dábálaš-beaivebálká
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Gen: dábálaš-beaivebálkká
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Acc: dábálaš-beaivebálkká
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Loc: dábálaš-beaivebálkkás
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Ill: dábálaš-beaivebálkái
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Sg+Com: dábálaš-beaivebálkkáin
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Nom: dábálaš-beaivebálkkát
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Gen: dábálaš-beaivebálkkáid
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Acc: dábálaš-beaivebálkkáid
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Loc: dábálaš-beaivebálkkáin
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Ill: dábálaš-beaivebálkkáide
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Pl+Com: dábálaš-beaivebálkkáiguin
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Ess: dábálaš-beaivebálkán
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dábálaš-beaivebálkkáš
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: dábálaš-beaivebálkkážaš
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: dábálaš-beaivebálkkáheapme
    dábálaš+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#beaivebálká+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: dábálaš-beaivebálkkálaš
